Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1423
Prohibited acts.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company, firm, corporation, association, or other organization which (1) without having complied with the Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act and without having first obtained a license (a) engages directly or indirectly in the business of funeral directing and embalming, (b) holds himself, herself, or itself out to the public as a funeral director and embalmer, or (c) performs or attempts to perform any of the services of a funeral establishment or branch establishment or of a funeral director and embalmer relating to the disposition of dead human bodies or (2) continues to perform such services after the license has expired or has been revoked or suspended shall be dealt with in the same manner as outlined in section 38-1,118. Each day so engaged in such business shall constitute and be deemed a separate offense.

Laws 1957, c. 295, § 7, p. 1062;

Laws 1973, LB 515, § 16;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 158;

Laws 1980, LB 94, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 50;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 101;

Laws 1991, LB 10, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 62;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 423;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 33;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 100;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1331;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 559.